North Carolina statutes. Chapter 97. Workers’ Compensation Act.
Article 1. Workers’ Compensation Act.
§ 97-78.
Salaries and expenses; administrator, executive secretary, deputy commissioners, and other staff assistance; annual report.

The salary of each commissioner shall be the same as that fixed from time to time for district attorneys except that the commissioner designated as chair shall receive one thousand five hundred dollars ($1,500) additional per annum.

The Commission may appoint an administrator whose duties shall be prescribed by the Commission. The Commission may appoint an executive secretary whose duties shall be prescribed by the Commission, and who, upon entering upon his duties, shall give bond in such sum as may be fixed by the Commission. The Commission may also employ such clerical or other assistance as it may deem necessary, and fix the compensation of its staff, except that the salaries of the administrator and the executive secretary shall be fixed by subsection (b1) of this section. The compensation of Commission staff shall be in keeping with the compensation paid to the persons employed to do similar work in other State departments.

(b1)

The salary of the administrator shall be ninety percent (90%) of the salary of a commissioner. The salary of the executive secretary shall be ninety percent (90%) of the salary of a commissioner.

(b2)

The Chairman of the Industrial Commission shall designate one deputy commissioner as chief deputy commissioner. The salary of the chief deputy commissioner shall be ninety percent (90%) of the salary of a commissioner.

(b3)

The salary of deputy commissioners shall be based upon years of experience as a deputy commissioner as follows:

Seventy-five percent (75%) of the salary of a commissioner, with three years of experience or less.

Seventy-seven percent (77%) of the salary of a commissioner, with more than three but less than seven years of experience.

Eighty percent (80%) of the salary of a commissioner, with seven or more but less than 10 years of experience.

Eighty-three percent (83%) of the salary of a commissioner, with 10 or more but less than 12 years of experience.

Eighty-five percent (85%) of the salary of a commissioner, with 12 or more years experience.

(b4)

In lieu of merit and other incremental raises, the administrator, executive secretary, chief deputy commissioner, and deputy commissioners shall receive longevity pay on the same basis as is provided to other employees subject to the North Carolina Human Resources Act.

The members of the Commission and its assistants shall be entitled to receive from the State their actual and necessary expenses while traveling on the business of the Commission, but such expenses shall be certified by the person who incurred the same, and shall be approved by the chairman of the Commission before payment is made.

All salaries and expenses of the Commission shall be audited and paid out of the State treasury, in the manner prescribed for similar expenses in other departments or branches of the State service, and to defray such salaries and expenses a sufficient appropriation shall be made under the General Appropriation Act as made to other departments, commissions and agencies of the State government.

No later than October 1 of each year, the Commission shall publish annually for free distribution a report of the administration of this Article, together with such recommendations as the Commission deems advisable. No later than October 1 of each year, the Commission shall submit this report to the Joint Legislative Oversight Committee on General Government, the Senate Appropriations Committee on General Government and Information Technology, and the House Appropriations Committee on General Government.

Every four years beginning April 1, 2022, the Commission shall prepare and implement a strategic plan for accomplishing all of the following:

Tracking compliance with the provisions of G.S. 97-18(b), (c), and (d), and establishing a procedure to enforce compliance with the requirements of these subsections.

Expeditiously resolving requests for, or disputes involving, medical compensation under

G.S. 97-25

, including selection of a physician, change of physician, the specific treatment involved, and the provider of such treatment.

The Commission shall demonstrate its success in implementing its strategic plan under subsection (f) of this section by including all of the following in its annual report under subsection (e) of this section:

The total number of claims made during the preceding fiscal year, the total number of claims in which compliance was not timely made, and, for each claim, the date the claim was filed, the date by which compliance was required, the date of actual compliance, and any sanctions or other remedial action imposed by the Commission.

The total number of requests for, and disputes involving, medical compensation under

G.S. 97-25

in which final disposition was not made within 75 days of the filing of the motion with the Commission, and, for each such request or dispute, the date the motion or other initial pleading was filed, the date on which final disposition was made.”

History.

1929, c. 120, s. 52; 1931, c. 274, s. 9; 1941, c. 358, s. 2; 1947, c. 823; 1957, c. 541, s. 6; 1971, c. 527, s. 1; c. 1147, s. 1; 1983, c. 717, s. 20; 1983 (Reg. Sess., 1984), c. 1034, s. 164; 1997-443, s. 33.4; 1998-212, s. 28.18(a); 2005-276, s. 29.20(b); 2007-323, ss. 13.4A(a), (b); 2013-382, s. 9.1(c); 2013-413, s. 60(a); 2014-77, s. 5; 2014-115, ss. 17, 55.4(c); 2017-57, s. 14.1(p); 2021-180, s. 37.8(a).

§ 97-78.1.
Standards of judicial conduct to apply to commissioners and deputy commissioners.

The Code of Judicial Conduct for judges of the General Court of Justice and the procedure for discipline of judges in Article 30 of Chapter 7A of the General Statutes shall apply to commissioners and deputy commissioners. Commissioners and deputy commissioners shall be liable for impeachment for the causes and in the manner provided for judges of the General Court of Justice in Chapter 123 of the General Statutes.

History.

2011-287, s. 18.

§ 97-79.
Offices and supplies; deputies with power to subpoena witnesses and to take testimony; meetings; hearings.

The Commission shall be provided with adequate offices in which the records shall be kept and its official business transacted during regular business hours; it shall also be provided with necessary office furniture, stationery, and other supplies.

The Chair of the Commission may appoint deputy commissioners to serve a term of six years. No person may serve more than two terms as a deputy commissioner. In calculating the number of terms served, a partial term of less than two years shall not be included. Deputy commissioners shall have the same power as members of the Commission pursuant to

G.S. 97-80

and the same power to take evidence and enter orders, opinions, and awards based thereon as is possessed by the members of the Commission. During the term, the deputy commissioner may only be removed from office pursuant to

G.S. 97-78.1

. Upon the expiration of each term, the deputy commissioner’s employment shall be separated unless reappointed by the Chair of the Commission.

The Commission or any member thereof may hold sessions at any place within the State as may be deemed necessary by the Commission.

Hearings before the Commission shall be open to the public and shall be stenographically reported, and the Commission is authorized to contract for the reporting of such hearings. The Commission shall by regulation provide for the preparation of a record of the hearings and other proceedings. Notwithstanding the provisions of this subsection, informal hearings conducted pursuant to the provisions of

G.S. 97-18.1

, whether by telephone or in person, shall not be open to the public nor stenographically reported unless the Commission orders otherwise.

The Commission, or any member thereof, or any deputy is authorized by appropriate order, to make additional parties plaintiff or defendant in any proceeding pending before the Commission when it is made to appear that such new party is either a necessary party or a proper party to a final determination of the proceeding.

The Commission shall create an ombudsman program to assist unrepresented claimants, employers, and other parties, to enable them to protect their rights under this Article. In addition to other duties assigned by the Commission, the ombudsman shall meet with, or otherwise provide information to, injured employees, investigate complaints, and communicate with employers’ insurance carriers and physicians at the request of the claimant. Assistance provided under this subsection shall not include representing the claimant in a compensation hearing.

The Commission shall adopt rules, in accordance with Article 2A of Chapter 150B of the General Statutes, for administrative motions, including practices and procedures for carrying out the provisions of this Article.

History.

1929, c. 120, s. 53; 1931, c. 274, s. 10; 1951, c. 1059, s. 7; 1955, c. 1026, s. 11; 1971, c. 527, s. 2; c. 1147, s. 2; 1981 (Reg. Sess., 1982), c. 1243, s. 1; 1993 (Reg. Sess., 1994), c. 679, s. 5.2; 2013-294, s. 5; 2013-413, s. 60(b); 2014-100, s. 15.16(a), (d); 2014-115, s. 17.

§ 97-80.
Rules and regulations; subpoena of witnesses; examination of books and records; depositions; costs.

The Commission shall adopt rules, in accordance with Article 2A of Chapter 150B of the General Statutes and not inconsistent with this Article, for carrying out the provisions of this Article.The Commission shall adopt rules establishing processes and procedure to be used under this Article.Processes, procedure, and discovery under this Article shall be as summary and simple as reasonably may be.

The Commission or any member thereof, or any person deputized by it, shall have the power, for the purpose of this Article, to tax costs against the parties, to administer or cause to have administered oaths, to preserve order at hearings, to compel the attendance and testimony of witnesses, and to compel the production of books, papers, records, and other tangible things.

The Commission may order parties to participate in mediation, under rules substantially similar to those approved by the Supreme Court for use in the Superior Court division, except the Commission shall determine the manner in which payment of the costs of the mediated settlement conference is assessed.

The Commission may order testimony to be taken by deposition and any party to a proceeding under this Article may, upon application to the Commission, which application shall set forth the materiality of the evidence to be given, cause the depositions of witnesses residing within or without the State to be taken, the costs to be taxed as other costs by Commission. Depositions ordered by the Commission upon application of a party shall be taken after giving the notice and in the manner prescribed by law for depositions in action at law, except that they shall be directed to the Commission, the commissioner, or the deputy commissioner before whom the proceedings may be pending.

A subpoena may be issued by the Commission and served in accordance with

G.S. 1A-1

, Rule 45. A party shall not issue a subpoena duces tecum less than 30 days prior to the hearing date except upon prior approval of the Commission. Upon a motion, the Commission may quash a subpoena if it finds that the evidence the production of which is required does not relate to a matter in issue, the subpoena does not describe with sufficient particularity the evidence the production of which is required, or for any other reason sufficient in law the subpoena may be quashed. Each witness who appears in obedience to such subpoena of the Commission shall receive for attendance the fees and mileage for witnesses in civil cases in courts of the county where the hearing is held.

The Commission may by rule provide for and limit the use of interrogatories and other forms of discovery, including production of books, papers, records, and other tangible things, and it may provide reasonable sanctions for failure to comply with a Commission order compelling discovery.

The Commission or any member or deputy thereof shall have the same power as a judicial officer pursuant to Chapter 5A of the General Statutes to hold a person in civil contempt, as provided thereunder, for failure to comply with an order of the Commission, Commission member, or deputy. A person held in civil contempt may appeal in the manner provided for appeals pursuant to

G.S. 97-85

and

G.S. 97-86

. The provisions of

G.S. 5A-24

shall not apply to appeals pursuant to this subsection.

The Commission or any member or deputy thereof shall also have the same power as a judicial officer pursuant to Chapter 5A of the General Statutes to punish for criminal contempt, subject to the limitations thereunder, (i) for willful behavior committed during the sitting of the commissioner or deputy commissioner and directly tending to interrupt the proceedings; (ii) for willful disobedience of a lawful order of the Commission or a member or deputy thereof; or (iii) for willful refusal to be sworn or affirmed as a witness, or, when so sworn or affirmed, willful refusal to answer any legal and proper question when refusal is not legally justified. The Commission or any member or deputy thereof may issue an order of arrest as provided by

G.S. 15A-305

when authorized by

G.S. 5A-16

in connection with contempt proceedings. When the commissioner or deputy commissioner chooses not to proceed summarily pursuant to

G.S. 5A-14

, the proceedings shall be before a district court judge, and venue lies throughout the district where the order was issued directing the person charged to appear. To initiate plenary proceedings in district court for indirect criminal contempt, the Commission shall issue and file with the clerk of court an order to appear and show cause pursuant to G.S. 5A-15(a) and, if appropriate, an order for arrest pursuant to

G.S. 5A-16

(b) and

G.S. 15A-305

. A person found in criminal contempt may appeal in the manner provided for appeals in criminal actions to the superior court of the district in which the order of contempt was issued, and the appeal is by hearing de novo before a superior court judge.

History.

1929, c. 120, s. 54; 1977, cc. 456, 505; 1981 (Reg. Sess., 1982), c. 1243, s. 2; 1993, c. 321, s. 25(b); c. 399, s. 1; 1993 (Reg. Sess., 1994), c. 679, ss. 5.3, 5.4; 1995, c. 358, s. 8(a), (b); c. 437, s. 6(a), (b); c. 467, s. 5(a), (b); c. 507, ss. 25.13, 27.8(o); c. 509, s. 48; 2000-140, s. 93.1(a); 2001-424, s. 12.2(b); 2011-287, s. 19; 2013-294, s. 6; 2016-100, s. 10.

Cross References.

As to medical committee fees, see

G.S. 97-74

.

As to costs on review, see

G.S. 97-88

.

As to medical fees, see

G.S. 97-89

.

§ 97-81.
Blank forms and literature; statistics; safety provisions; accident reports; studies and investigations and recommendations to General Assembly; to cooperate with other agencies for prevention of injury.

The Commission shall prepare and cause to be printed, and upon request furnish, free of charge to any employee or employer, such blank forms and literature as it shall deem requisite to facilitate or prompt the efficient administration of this Article. Notwithstanding G.S. 150B-2(8a)d., any new forms or substantive amendments to old forms adopted after July 1, 2013, shall be adopted in accordance with Article 2A of Chapter 150B of the General Statutes. The Commission may authorize the use of electronic submission of forms and other means of transmittal of forms and notices when it deems appropriate.

The Commission shall tabulate the accident reports received from employers in accordance with

G.S. 97-92

and shall publish the same in the annual report of the Commission and as often as it may deem advisable, in such detailed or aggregate form as it may deem best. The name of the employer or employee shall not appear in such publications, and the employers’ reports shall be private records of the Commission, and shall not be open for public inspection except for the inspection of the parties directly involved, and only to the extent of such interest, and except for inspection by the Department of Labor and other State or federal agencies pursuant to subsections (d) and (e) of this section. These reports shall not be used as evidence against any employer in any suit at law brought by any employee for the recovery of damages.

Repealed by Session Laws 2017-203, s. 5, effective August 11, 2017.

In making such studies and investigations the Commission shall:

Cooperate with any agency of the United States charged with the duty of enforcing any law securing safety against injury in any employment covered by this Article, or with any State agency engaged in enforcing any laws to assure safety for employees, and

Permit any such agency to have access to the records of the Commission.In carrying out the provisions of this section the Commission or any officer or employee of the Commission is authorized to enter at any reasonable time upon any premises, tracks, wharf, dock, or other landing place, or to enter any building, where an employment covered by this Article is being carried on, and to examine any tool, appliance, or machinery used in such employment.

The Commission shall, upon written request from the Commissioner of Labor, provide from the Commission’s records the following information from claims filed by employees, and from employer reports of injury to an employee required by

G.S. 97-92

:

Name and business address of the employer;

Type of business of the employer;

Date the accident, illness, or injury occurred;

Nature of the injury or disease reported; and

Whether compensation for disability or medical expenses was paid to the injured employee.Information provided to the Commissioner of Labor pursuant to this subsection, and to other State and federal agencies pursuant to subsection (d) of this section, shall be private and exempt from public inspection to the same extent that records of the Commission are so exempt.

History.

1929, c. 120, s. 55; 1991 (Reg. Sess., 1992), c. 894, s. 2; 1993 (Reg. Sess., 1994), c. 679, s. 10.2; 2013-294, s. 7; 2017-203, s. 5.

Effect of Amendments.

Session Laws 2013-294, s. 7, effective July 18, 2013, added the second sentence in subsection (a).

Session Laws 2017-203, s. 5, effective August 11, 2017, repealed subsection (c).

§ 97-82.
Memorandum of agreement between employer and employee to be submitted to Commission on prescribed forms for approval; direct payment as award.

If the employer and the injured employee or his dependents reach an agreement in regard to compensation under this Article, they may enter into a memorandum of the agreement in the form prescribed by the Commission.An agreement, however, shall be incorporated into a memorandum of agreement in regard to compensation: (i) for loss or permanent injury, disfigurement, or permanent and total disability under

G.S. 97-31

, (ii) for death from a compensable injury or occupational disease under

G.S. 97-38

, or (iii) when compensation under this Article is paid or payable to an employee who is incompetent or under 18 years of age.The memorandum of agreement, accompanied by the material medical and vocational records, shall be filed with and approved by the Commission; otherwise such agreement shall be voidable by the employee or his dependents.

If approved by the Commission, a memorandum of agreement shall for all purposes be enforceable by the court’s decree as hereinafter specified. Payment pursuant to G.S. 97-18(b), or payment pursuant to G.S. 97-18(d) when compensability and liability are not contested prior to expiration of the period for payment without prejudice, shall constitute an award of the Commission on the question of compensability of and the insurer’s liability for the injury as reflected on a form prescribed by the Commission pursuant to G.S. 97-18(b) or G.S. 97-18(d) for which payment was made. An award of the Commission arising out of G.S. 97-18(b) or G.S. 97-18(d) shall not create a presumption that medical treatment for an injury or condition not identified in the form prescribed by the Commission pursuant to G.S. 97-18(b) or G.S. 97-18(d) is causally related to the compensable injury. An employee may request a hearing pursuant to

G.S. 97-84

to prove that an injury or condition is causally related to the compensable injury. Compensation paid in these circumstances shall constitute payment of compensation pursuant to an award under this Article.

History.

1929, c. 120, s. 56; 1993 (Reg. Sess., 1994), c. 679, s. 3.2; 2005-448, s. 7; 2017-124, s. 1(a).

§ 97-83.
Commission is to make award after hearing.

If the employer and the injured employee or his dependents fail to reach an agreement in regard to benefits under this Article within 14 days after the employer has written or actual notice of the injury or death, or upon the arising of a dispute under this Article, either party may make application to the Commission for a hearing in regard to the matters at issue, and for a ruling thereon.

Immediately after such application has been received the Commission shall set the date of a hearing, which shall he held as soon as practicable and shall notify the parties at issue of the time and place of such hearing. The hearing or hearings shall be held in the city or county where the injury occurred, unless otherwise authorized by the Commission.

History.

1929, c. 120, s. 57; 1955, c. 1026, s. 121/2; 1977, c. 743; 1993 (Reg. Sess., 1994), c. 679, s. 3.3.

§ 97-83.1.
Facilities for hearings; security.

The senior resident superior court judge shall provide suitable facilities for the conduct of hearings under this Article in the county or counties within the judge’s district at the time the Commission schedules hearings therein. The senior resident superior court judge shall, to the extent the judge determines necessary and practicable, provide or arrange for security at Commission hearings upon the request of a member or deputy of the Commission.

History.

1993 (Reg. Sess., 1994), c. 679, s. 5.7.

§ 97-84.
Determination of disputes by Commission or deputy.

The Commission or any of its members or deputies shall hear the parties at issue and their representatives and witnesses, and shall determine the dispute in a summary manner. The case shall be decided and findings of fact issued based upon the preponderance of the evidence in view of the entire record. The award, together with a statement of the findings of fact, rulings of law, and other matters pertinent to the questions at issue shall be filed with the record of the proceedings, within 180 days of the close of the hearing record unless time is extended for good cause by the Commission, and a copy of the award shall immediately be sent to the parties in dispute. If the deputy or member of the Commission that heard the parties at issue and their representatives and witnesses is unable to determine the matters in dispute and issue an award, the Commission may assign another deputy or member to decide the case and issue an award.

History.

1929, c. 120, s. 58; 1951, c. 1059, s. 7; 1987, c. 729, s. 15; 2011-287, s. 20; 2017-150, s. 3.

§ 97-85.
Review of award.

If application is made to the Commission within 15 days from the date when notice of the award shall have been given, the full Commission shall review the award, and, if good ground be shown therefor, reconsider the evidence, receive further evidence, rehear the parties or their representatives, and, if proper, amend the award: Provided, however, when application is made for review of an award, and such an award has been heard and determined by a commissioner of the North Carolina Industrial Commission, the commissioner who heard and determined the dispute in the first instance, as specified by

G.S. 97-84

, shall be disqualified from sitting with the full Commission on the review of such award, and the chairman of the Industrial Commission shall designate a deputy commissioner to take such commissioner’s place in the review of the particular award. The deputy commissioner so designated, along with the two other commissioners, shall compose the full Commission upon review. Provided further, the chairman of the Industrial Commission shall have the authority to designate a deputy commissioner to take the place of a commissioner on the review of any case, in which event the deputy commissioner so designated shall have the same authority and duty as does the commissioner whose place he occupies on such review.

Unless waived by consent of the parties, all hearings of the full Commission shall be recorded. Court reporters, transcription personnel, or electronic or other mechanical devices may be utilized. If an electronic or other mechanical device is utilized, it shall be the duty of some person designated by the Commission to operate the device while a hearing is in progress, and the recording shall be preserved and may be transcribed, as required. If stenotype, shorthand, or stenomask equipment is used, the original tapes, notes, discs, or other records are the property of the State and the Commission shall keep them in its custody. The compensation and allowances of reporters shall be fixed by the Commission in a manner that is consistent with policies set by the Administrative Office of the Courts for the General Court of Justice.

History.

1929, c. 120, s. 59; 1963, c. 402; 1977, cc. 390, 431; 2013-163, s. 1.

§ 97-86.
Award conclusive as to facts; appeal; certified questions of law.

The award of the Industrial Commission, as provided in

G.S. 97-84

, if not reviewed in due time, or an award of the Commission upon such review, as provided in

G.S. 97-85

, shall be conclusive and binding as to all questions of fact; but either party to the dispute may, within 30 days from the date of the award or within 30 days after receipt of notice to be sent by any class of U.S. mail that is fully prepaid or electronic mail of the award, but not thereafter, appeal from the decision of the Commission to the Court of Appeals for errors of law under the same terms and conditions as govern appeals from the superior court to the Court of Appeals in ordinary civil actions. The procedure for the appeal shall be as provided by the rules of appellate procedure.

The Industrial Commission of its own motion may certify questions of law to the Court of Appeals for decision and determination by the Court. In case of an appeal from the decision of the Commission, or of a certification by the Commission of questions of law, to the Court of Appeals, the appeal or certification shall operate on a supersedeas except as provided in

G.S. 97-86.1

, and no employer shall be required to make payment of the award involved in the appeal or certification until the questions at issue therein shall have been fully determined in accordance with the provisions of this Article. If the employer is a noninsurer, then the appeal of the employer shall not act as a supersedeas and the plaintiff in such case shall have the same right to issue execution or to satisfy the award from the property of the employer pending the appeal as obtains to the successful party in an action in the superior court.

When any party to an appeal from an award of the Commission is unable, by reason of the party’s poverty, to make the deposit or to give the security required by law for the appeal, any member of the Commission or any deputy commissioner shall enter an order allowing the party to appeal from the award of the Commission without giving security therefor. The party appealing from the judgment shall, within 30 days from the filing of the appeal from the award, make an affidavit that the party is unable by reason of the party’s poverty to give the security required by law. The request shall be passed upon and granted or denied by a member of the Commission or deputy commissioner within 20 days from receipt of the affidavit.

History.

1929, c. 120, s. 60; 1947, c. 823; 1957, c. 1396, s. 9; 1959, c. 863, s. 4; 1967, c. 669; 1971, c. 1189; 1975, c. 391, s. 15; 1977, c. 521, s. 1; 1993 (Reg. Sess., 1994), c. 679, s. 10.5; 1995 (Reg. Sess., 1996), c. 552, s. 1; 2017-57, s. 15.17.

Effect of Amendments.

Session Laws 2017-57, s. 15.17, effective July 1, 2017, substituted “any class of U.S. mail that is fully prepaid or electronic mail” for “registered mail or certified mail” in the first sentence of the first paragraph; and, in the last paragraph, substituted “the party’s poverty” for “his poverty” in two places, substituted “the party is unable” for “he is unable”, substituted “affidavit” for “affidavit specified above”, and made stylistic changes.

Legal Periodicals.

For note on “jurisdictional fact” review by superior courts, see 37 N.C.L. Rev. 219 (1959).

For survey of case law as to findings of jurisdictional facts upon judicial review of decisions of Industrial Commission, see 44 N.C.L. Rev. 892 (1966).

For case law survey as to judicial review of decisions of administrative agencies, see 45 N.C.L. Rev. 816 (1967).

For article on administrative evidence rules, see 49 N.C.L. Rev. 635 (1971).

§ 97-86.1.
Payment of award pending appeal in certain cases.

When any appeal or certification to the Court of Appeals is pending, and it appears to the Commission that any part of the award appealed from is not appealed by the issues raised by such appeal, the Commission may, on action or of its own motion, render a judgment directing compliance with any portion of such award not affected by such appeal; or, if the only issue raised by such appeal is the amount of the average weekly wage, the Commission shall, on motion of the claimant, direct the payment of such portion of the compensation payable under its award as is not in dispute, if any, pending final adjudication of the undisputed portion thereof.

In any claim under the provisions of this Chapter where it is conceded by all parties that the employee’s claim is a compensable one and the amount is not disputed and where the only issue is which employer or employers, carrier or carriers are liable, the Commission may, where an appeal from a hearing commissioner or the full Commission is taken by one or more parties, order payment made to the employee pending outcome of the case on appeal. The order of payment shall contain the provision that if the employer or carrier ordered to pay is not ultimately liable for the amount paid, the employer or carrier will be reimbursed by the employer or carrier ultimately held liable.

No payment made pursuant to the provisions of this section shall in any manner operate as an admission of liability or estoppel to deny liability by an employer or carrier.

In any claim under the provisions of this Chapter wherein one employer or carrier has made payments to the employee or his dependents pending a final disposition of the claim and it is determined that different or additional employers or carriers are liable, the Commission may order any employers or carriers determined liable to make repayment in full or in part to any employer or carrier which has made payments to the employee or his dependents.

History.

1977, c. 521, s. 2.

Legal Periodicals.

For survey of 1977 worker’s compensation law, see 56 N.C.L. Rev. 1166 (1978).

§ 97-86.2.
Interest on awards after hearing.

In any workers’ compensation case in which an order is issued either granting or denying an award to the employee and where there is an appeal resulting in an ultimate award to the employee, the insurance carrier or employer shall pay interest on the final award or unpaid portion thereof from the date of the initial hearing on the claim, until paid at the legal rate of interest provided in

G.S. 24-1

. If interest is paid it shall not be a part of, or in any way increase attorneys’ fees, but shall be paid in full to the claimant.

History.

1981, c. 242, s. 1; 1985, c. 598; 1987, c. 729, s. 16.

Legal Periodicals.

For survey of 1981 administrative law, see 60 N.C.L. Rev. 1165 (1982).

§ 97-87.
Judgments on awards.

As used in this section, “award” includes the following:

A form filed, or an award arising, under G.S. 97-18(b), 97-18(d), or 97-82(b).

A memorandum of agreement approved by the Commission.

An order or decision of the Commission.

An award of the Commission from which there has been no appeal.

An award of the Commission affirmed on appeal.

When an award or portion of an award provides for a sum certain or for a sum that can by computation be made certain, and that sum is due and payable as of the date of the award, a judgment may be docketed as provided in subsection (d) of this section, in an amount equal to that sum.

When an award or portion of an award provides for periodic payments to be made on or after the date of the award, a judgment may be docketed as provided in subsection (d) of this section, in an amount equal to the sum stated in any Certificate of Accrued Arrearages that is issued by the Commission under this subsection. If any payment that has accrued after the date of the award, or after the date specified in the most recent Certificate of Accrued Arrearages issued under this subsection, is not received by the claimant when due, the following procedure is available for obtaining a Certificate of Accrued Arrearages:

The claimant may file with the Commission a Statement of Accrued Arrearages, on a form approved by the Commission, and shall serve a copy on all parties against whom judgment is sought and their attorney of record.

Any party against whom judgment is sought may, within 15 days of the date of service of a Statement of Accrued Arrearages, file with the Commission proof of any payments that have been made or other responsive pleadings.

If no proof or other responsive pleading is filed within 15 days of the date of service of the Statement, the Commission shall immediately issue a Certificate of Accrued Arrearages.

If proof of payment or other responsive pleading is filed, the Commission shall, within seven days, either issue a Certificate of Accrued Arrearages that shall state the sum of payments due or decline to issue a Certificate of Accrued Arrearages. The Commission shall notify the claimant, the party against whom judgment is sought, and their attorney of record of the Commission’s decision.

If any party disputes the decision of the Commission entered under subdivision (c)(4) of this section, the party may appeal to the full Commission within 10 days of the entry of the decision of the Commission. The nonappealing party may file a response within 10 days of receiving notice of appeal. The notice of appeal shall request one of the following:

The Commission reconsider the decision entered based on the record and any additional evidence that parties submit with the notice and response.

A de novo evidentiary hearing before the full Commission.

The Commission shall grant the request for an evidentiary hearing under sub-subdivision (c)(5)b. of this section if a material issue of fact exists whose resolution is necessary to determine the appeal.

If a notice of appeal is given under sub-subdivision (c)(5)a. of this section, the Commission shall issue its decision within 10 days of the filing of the response under subdivision (c)(5)b. of this section. If a notice of appeal is given under sub-subdivision (c)(5) of this section, the Commission shall either conduct an evidentiary hearing and issue its decision on the appeal within 90 days of the filing of the response under subdivision (c)(5) of this section or deny the request for the evidentiary hearing and issue its decision within 10 days of the filing of the response under subdivision (c)(5) of this section. Further appeals are governed by

G.S. 97-86

.

Each award and each Certificate of Accrued Arrearages shall include the following information:

The names and addresses of the parties.

The sum of all principal amounts that have accrued and remain unpaid since the date of the award or since the date of the most recent prior Certificate of Accrued Arrearages.

The total of any interest that has accrued on the award, as of the date of the Certificate of Accrued Arrearages, since the date of the award or since the date of the most recent prior Certificate of Accrued Arrearages.

Any costs, penalties, or monetary sanctions included in the award.

Any party in interest may file a certified copy of an award described in subsection (b) of this section, or of a Certificate of Accrued Arrearages, in the office of the clerk of superior court of the county in which the defendant has a place of business or has property, or in which an injury occurred, or in Wake County. An award shall be accompanied by the party’s affidavit stating that the award has become final and the time for making the first payment under the award has expired.

Promptly after a certified copy of an award or of a Certificate of Accrued Arrearages is filed, the clerk shall docket and index a judgment as provided in Chapter 1 of the General Statutes. The principal amount in the award or in the Certificate of Accrued Arrearages shall bear interest at the judgment rate from the date the judgment is docketed. The judgment may be enforced in the same manner as a judgment docketed under Chapter 1 of the General Statutes.

The filing of an award, or of a Certificate of Accrued Arrearages, for docketing as a judgment under this section shall be treated as a civil action for record-keeping purposes. The amount in which the judgment is docketed shall determine the amount of the costs to be collected at the time of filing and assessed pursuant to

G.S. 7A-305

.

Nothing in this section shall be construed to limit the Commission’s authority to impose any other remedy provided by law.

History.

1929, c. 120, s. 61; 2001-477, s. 1.

§ 97-88.
Expenses of appeals brought by insurers.

If the Industrial Commission at a hearing on review or any court before which any proceedings are brought on appeal under this Article, shall find that such hearing or proceedings were brought by the insurer and the Commission or court by its decision orders the insurer to make, or to continue payments of benefits, including compensation for medical expenses, to the injured employee, the Commission or court may further order that the cost to the injured employee of such hearing or proceedings including therein reasonable attorney’s fee to be determined by the Commission shall be paid by the insurer as a part of the bill of costs.

History.

1929, c. 120, s. 62; 1931, c. 274, s. 11; 1971, c. 500.

Cross References.

As to the assessment of costs incurred in hearings brought without reasonable grounds, see

G.S. 97-88.1

.

§ 97-88.1.
Attorney’s fees at original hearing.

If the Industrial Commission shall determine that any hearing has been brought, prosecuted, or defended without reasonable ground, it may assess the whole cost of the proceedings including reasonable fees for defendant’s attorney or plaintiff ’s attorney upon the party who has brought or defended them.

History.

1979, c. 268, s. 1.

Legal Periodicals.

For survey of 1982 law on workers’ compensation, see 61 N.C.L. Rev. 1243 (1983).